Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1)(a) A city, town, or county that has been designated as a fan zone or host city from an international self-regulatory governing body of a sports association, or a nonprofit organization created by such an entity, may request, and the board may approve, expanded alcohol service for liquor licensees within a two-square block area in the city, town, or county or two different one-block areas within the city, town, or county. The authorization in this section may be used to allow expanded alcohol sales and service only during the months of June and July of 2026.(b) Multiple licensees located within an area of a city, town, or county approved under this section for expanded alcohol service may share an alcohol service area encompassing the entire approved area or areas, during an event, so long as:(i) The board approves of the event perimeter enclosing the alcohol service area;(ii) Security and physical barriers are provided at all entry points to the event;(iii) The applicable city, town, or county through a designated official notifies the board within a minimum time required by the board in rule before the event begins;(iv) All participating licensees submit a joint operating plan to the board for approval, in a format designated by the board, that describes: (A) How the licensees will prevent the sale and service of alcohol to persons under 21 years of age and those who appear to be intoxicated; (B) the ratio of alcohol service staff and security staff to the anticipated number of attendees, subject to a ratio requirement that may be set by the board; (C) training provided to staff who serve, regulate, or supervise the service of alcohol including that alcohol server training is required for all such staff; (D) the licensees' policy on the number of alcoholic beverages that will be served to an individual patron during one transaction, subject to a limit determined by the board; (E) an explanation of the alcoholic beverage containers that will be used to ensure they are significantly different from containers used from nonalcoholic beverages; (F) the barriers or demarcations to be used for an alcohol service area or event perimeter; and (G) other information required by the board in rule.(c) Licensees operating under this section may share use of an alcohol service area with other licensees and licensees may share use of an alcohol service area with businesses that do not engage in the sale or service of alcohol, subject to requirements of the board. All participating licensees are jointly responsible for any violation or enforcement issues unless it can be demonstrated that the violation or enforcement issue was due to one or more licensee's specific conduct or action, in which case the violation or enforcement applies only to those identified licensees.(d) During the times a licensee is operating under the authorization in this section, the licensee may:(i) Operate without a permit from their local jurisdiction that may otherwise be required to allow the business to use the public space as an alcohol service area;(ii) Share an alcohol service area with another licensee: (A) Without individually requesting approval from the board's licensing division; and (B) regardless of whether the licensees' property parcels or buildings are located in direct physical proximity to one another; and(iii) Sell and serve alcohol to customers from an alcohol service area without offering food service menu options, except that any required food service must still be provided within the licensed premises, and in any preexisting alcohol service area operated by the licensee under the board's rules that does not rely on the authorization in this section, if the preexisting alcohol service area remains in place during an event.(2) The authorization in this section is available to the following liquor licensees: Beer and wine restaurants; spirits, beer, and wine restaurants; taverns; domestic wineries; domestic breweries and microbreweries; distilleries; and snack bars.(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Alcohol service area" means an area in which liquor may be sold, served, and consumed as authorized under this title and rules of the board.(b) "Board" means the liquor and cannabis board.(4) This section expires August 1, 2026.Sec. 2. RCW 66.24.710 and 2023 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the following licensees may sell alcohol products at retail for takeout or delivery or both under liquor and cannabis board licenses and endorsements: Beer and wine restaurants; spirits, beer, and wine restaurants; taverns; domestic wineries; domestic breweries and microbreweries; distilleries; snack bars; nonprofit arts licensees; and caterers.(b) No alcohol products may be sold by delivery under this section after July 1, 2025.(2) Spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees may sell premixed cocktails for takeout and, until July 1, 2025, for delivery. The board may establish by rule the manner in which premixed cocktails for off-premises consumption must be provided. This subsection does not authorize the sale of bottles of spirits by licensees for off-premises consumption.(3) Spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees may sell wine by the glass or premixed wine and spirits cocktails for takeout and, until July 1, 2025, delivery. Beer and wine restaurant licensees may sell wine or premixed wine drinks by the glass for takeout and, until July 1, 2025, delivery. The board may establish by rule the manner in which wine by the glass and premixed cocktails for off-premises consumption must be provided.(4) Licensees that were authorized by statute or rule before January 1, 2020, to sell growlers for on-premises consumption may sell growlers for off-premises consumption through takeout or, until July 1, 2025, delivery. Sale of growlers under this subsection must meet federal alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau requirements.(5)(a) Licensees must obtain from the board an endorsement to their license in order to conduct activities authorized under subsections (1) through (4) of this section. The board may adopt rules governing the manner in which the activities authorized under this section must be conducted. Licensees must not be charged a fee in order to obtain an endorsement required under this section.(b)(i) Alcohol delivery under this section must be performed by an employee of an alcohol delivery endorsement holder who is 21 years of age or older and possesses a class 12 permit, in accordance with RCW 66.20.310.(ii) Delivery services conducted by beer and wine restaurant licensees and spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees under this section must be accompanied by a purchased meal prepared and sold by the license holder.(c) Alcohol sold for takeout by beer and wine restaurant licensees and spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees under this section must be accompanied by a purchased meal prepared and sold by the license holder.(d) Any alcohol product sold for takeout or delivery under this section must be in a factory sealed container or a tamper-resistant container.(6) Beer and wine specialty shops licensed under RCW 66.24.371 and domestic breweries and microbreweries may sell prefilled growlers for off-premises consumption through takeout and, until July 1, 2025, delivery, provided that prefilled growlers are sold the same day they are prepared for sale and not stored overnight for sale on future days.(7) ((The))Subject to section 1 of this act, the board must adopt or revise current rules to allow for outdoor service of alcohol by on-premises licensees holding licenses issued by the board for the following license types: Beer and wine restaurants; spirits, beer, and wine restaurants; taverns; domestic wineries; domestic breweries and microbreweries; distilleries; snack bars; and private clubs licensed under RCW 66.24.450 and 66.24.452. The board may adopt requirements providing for clear accountability at locations where multiple licensees use a shared space for serving customers, and, pursuant to section 1 of this act, at locations where a licensee or licensees use a shared space with another business or businesses that do not engage in the sale or service of alcohol.(8) Upon delivery of any alcohol product authorized to be delivered under this section, the signature of the person age 21 or over receiving the delivery must be obtained.(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Board" means the liquor and cannabis board.(b) "Growlers" means sanitary containers brought to the premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled by the retailer at the time of sale.Sec. 3. RCW 66.08.030 and 2014 c 63 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The power of the board to make regulations under chapter 34.05 RCW extends to:(1) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;(2) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and determining the manner in which they must be attached to every package of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of different official seals or different official labels for different classes of liquor;(3) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the regulations, and the terms and conditions to be contained in permits and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications for receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a criminal history record information check. The board may submit the criminal history record information check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board must require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;(4) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title, and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;(5) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same is kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at any time at the instance of the board;(6) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;(7) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;(8) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a stated period;(9) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in this title;(10) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books, records and the liquor so kept;(11) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;(12) ((Prescribing))Subject to section 1 of this act, prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer, wines, and spirits, and regulating the sale of beer, wines, and spirits thereunder;(13) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which manufacturers must deliver liquor within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the state;(14) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;(15) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;(16) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and for the checking of any such return;(17) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the employees of the board. However, the premiums therefor must be paid by the board;(18) Providing for the shipment of liquor to any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by election pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;(19) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation, standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the board; and conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect thereof;(20) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of the board. However, nothing herein contained may be construed as authorizing the ((liquor)) board to prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change the present law as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic beverages;(21) Monitoring and regulating the practices of license holders as necessary in order to prevent the theft and illegal trafficking of liquor pursuant to RCW 66.28.350; and(22) Until August 1, 2026, imposing reasonable requirements on licensees' operations of alcohol service areas under section 1 of this act.Sec. 4. RCW 66.44.100 and 1999 c 189 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Except as permitted by this title, including as allowed under section 1 of this act between the effective date of this section and August 1, 2026, no person shall open the package containing liquor or consume liquor in a public place. Every person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.--- END ---